src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-vuqvdd_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - vuʹvdd â-stem: # Noun 'kaulaliina' - full paradigm
     vuʹvdd+N+Sg+Nom: vuʹvdd
     vuʹvdd+N+Sg+Gen: vuuʹd
     vuʹvdd+N+Sg+Acc: vuuʹd
     vuʹvdd+N+Sg+Ill: voudda
     vuʹvdd+N+Sg+Loc: vuuʹdest
     vuʹvdd+N+Sg+Com: vuuʹdin
     vuʹvdd+N+Ess: vuʹvdden
     vuʹvdd+N+Par: vuʹvdded
     vuʹvdd+N+Sg+Abe: [vuuʹdtaa, vuuʹdtää]
     vuʹvdd+N+Pl+Nom: vuuʹd
     vuʹvdd+N+Pl+Gen: vuuʹdi
     vuʹvdd+N+Pl+Acc: vuuʹdid
     vuʹvdd+N+Pl+Ill: vuuʹdid
     vuʹvdd+N+Pl+Loc: vuuʹdin
     vuʹvdd+N+Pl+Com: vuuʹdivuiʹm
     vuʹvdd+N+Pl+Abe: [vuuʹditaa, vuuʹditää]
